District of Columbia statutes.
13-432

Individuals eligible to make service.

Service outside the District of Columbia may be made by an individual who is permitted to make service of process under the law of the District of Columbia or under the law of the place in which the service is made or who is designated by a District of Columbia court.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 550, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 132(a)
1981 Ed., § 13-432.
1973 Ed., § 13-432.